Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-639
Birth or death certificate; amendments; evaluation of evidence.

The department shall evaluate all evidence submitted for amendments to vital records and when it finds reason to question its validity or adequacy it may reject the amendment and shall advise the applicant of the reasons for this action.

Laws 1971, LB 245, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 164;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 439.